Wisconsin, session 2025, SB102.
do enact as follows:SB102,11Section 1. Agreement ratified. The legislature ratifies the tentative 2agreement negotiated for the 2024-25 fiscal year between the University of 3Wisconsin-Madison and the Wisconsin State Building Trades Negotiating 4Committee, covering employees in the building trades crafts collective bargaining 5unit under subch. V of ch. 111, as approved by the employees of the building trades 6crafts collective bargaining unit and approved and recommended by the joint 7committee on employment relations, and authorizes the necessary expenditure of 8moneys for implementation from the appropriations made by s. 20.865 (1), subject 9to s. 20.865 (intro.). The University of Wisconsin-Madison shall file an official copy 10of the agreement, certified by the cochairpersons of the joint committee on 11employment relations, with the secretary of state. No formal or informal agreement 12between the parties that is not a part of the official copy is deemed to be approved by 13the legislature under this act.SB102,214Section 2. Effective date.SB102,2,1815(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, except that those 16provisions specifically identified as having other effective dates in the agreement 17covering employees in the building trades crafts collective bargaining unit are 18effective on the dates provided in that agreement.SB102,2,1919